Louisiana, session 2026, SB239.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Art. 2315(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2315. Liability for acts causing damages
* * *
C. To recover for mental anguish or emotional distress, absent physical
injury under this Article, the injured person shall prove the especial likelihood
of genuine and serious mental distress arising from the circumstances of the
defendant's conduct.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-599 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 239